Delaware, session 153, HB448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 8020, Title 15 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 8020. Authorized campaign expenditures. No political committee may make any expenditure except for the following purposes: (1) Wages of full-time or part-time campaign staff (but no salary or wage for a candidate or a candidateâs spouse). (2) Travel expenses of the candidate and campaign staff. (3) Payment of fees or charges for placing the name of the candidate on the ballot, and for collecting the returns of the election. (4) Costs of telephone and other communications services. (5) Costs of postage and other delivery services. (6) Printing and stationery. (7) Food, refreshments and related supplies. (8) Purchase and preparation of lists of voters. (9) Taking polls and making canvasses of voters. (10) Payment for election watchers. (11) Rental of office and rental and purchase of equipment. (12) Advertising and publicity. (13) In the case of a candidate committee, purchase of tickets to permit the candidateâs attendance at civic or political events; and in the case of a political action committee, contributions within authorized limits, to any other political committee. (14) Holding, promoting and furnishing meetings, demonstrations, conventions, and paying musicians and others rendering services in connection with those activities. (15) Employing attorneys, accountants and other professional advisors. (16) In the case of a candidate committee, contributions, within the limits set forth in Â§ 8010(a) of this title, to another candidate committee, or as otherwise provided in Â§ 8022 of this title. (17) In the case of a political party or a political action committee, contributions, within authorized limits, to a candidate committee. (18) In the case of any political action committee, in addition to any other expenditure authorized by this chapter, contributions to a political party within the limits set forth in Â§ 8011 of this title. (19) Returning any donorâs contribution up to the amount donated. (20) Reasonable and necessary expenses for the care of the candidateâs child or children incurred in connection with the candidateâs campaign activities. (21) Any fee associated with obtaining a criminal history background check as required under this title. (22) a. Security expenses related to ensuring the safety of the candidate that are associated with the candidateâs activities, duties, or status as a candidate or elected official. Security expenses authorized under this paragraph must be separately itemized on political committee reports required under this chapter. b. For purposes of this paragraph, âsecurity expensesâ include the reasonable costs of installing and monitoring a home or office electronic security system, personal security, cameras, fences, or other comparable security-related equipment or devices reasonably necessary to address a security risk arising from the candidateâs status. âSecurity expensesâ do not include payments for a firearm. Section 2. The Commissioner shall promulgate rules to implement this Act within 3 months of this Actâs enactment. The rules must require that security expenses are reported in sufficient detail to substantiate that the security expenses are authorized campaign expenditures.